Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-613.01
President; nominating petition; form.

In addition to the requirements of section 32-613, the form of a petition for partisan candidates for President of the United States shall be substantially as follows:

Petition for Office of President of the United States

Name of Candidate: ............

Residence Address: ............

City, State, and Zip Code: ............

Party Affiliation: ............

To the Honorable ............, Secretary of State for the State of Nebraska:

We, the undersigned residents of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............, respectfully demand that the above-named candidate be placed on the ballot at the primary election to be held on the .... day of ......... 20...., and each for himself or herself says:

I have personally signed this petition on the date opposite my name;

I am a registered voter of the State of Nebraska and the county of ............ and am qualified to sign this petition and am affiliated with the appropriate political party or I will be so registered, qualified, and affiliated on or before the date on which this petition is filed with the Secretary of State; and

My printed name, date of birth, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address are correctly written after my signature.

(Here follow numbered lines for signature, printed name, date of birth, date, street and number or voting precinct, and city, village, or post office address.)

Laws 2025, LB521, § 40.